Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-9308
Travel administrator; requirements; responsibilities.

(1) No person shall act as or represent that such person is a travel administrator for travel insurance in this state unless such person:

(a) Is a licensed property and casualty insurance producer in this state for activities permitted under such producer license;

(b) Holds a valid managing general agent license in this state; or

(c) Holds a valid third-party administrator license in this state.

(2) A travel administrator and such travel administrator's employees are exempt from the licensing requirements of adjusters for travel insurance such administrator and its employees administer.

(3) An insurer is responsible for the acts of a travel administrator administering travel insurance underwritten by the insurer and is responsible for ensuring that the travel administrator maintains all books and records relevant to the insurer to be made available by the travel administrator to the department upon request.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 8.